Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-121
Taxable property, defined.

Taxable property shall mean any real or tangible personal property subject to tax pursuant to law and not exempt from tax.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 50;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 48.